Utah statutes.
78B-13-310.   Hearing and order.
(1)  Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order pursuant to Section
78B-13-204, upon a finding that a petitioner is entitled to the physical
custody of the child immediately, the court shall order the child delivered to
the petitioner unless the respondent establishes that:
(a)  the child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed
under Section 78B-13-305, and that:
(i)  the issuing court did not have jurisdiction under Part 2, Jurisdiction;
(ii)  the child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been
vacated, stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do
so under Part 2, Jurisdiction, or federal law; or
(iii)  the respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in
accordance with the standards of Section 78B-13-108 in the proceedings before
the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought; or
(b)  the child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was
registered and confirmed under Section 78B-13-305, but has been vacated,
stayed, or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under
Part 2, Jurisdiction, or federal law.
(2)  The court shall award the fees, costs, and expenses authorized under
Section 78B-13-312 and may grant additional relief, including a request for
the assistance of law enforcement officials, and set a further hearing to
determine whether additional relief is appropriate.
(3)  If a party called to testify refuses to answer on the ground that the
testimony may be self-incriminating, the court may draw an adverse inference
from the refusal.
(4)  A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses and a
defense of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent
and child may not be invoked in a proceeding under this chapter.
